Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.110

City manager—Interference by councilmembers.

Neither the council, nor any of its committees or members shall direct or request the appointment of any person to, or his or her removal from, office by the city manager or any of his or her subordinates. Except for the purpose of inquiry, the council and its members shall deal with the administrative service solely through the manager and neither the council nor any committee or member thereof shall give orders to any subordinate of the city manager, either publicly or privately: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the council, while in open session, from fully and freely discussing with the city manager anything pertaining to appointments and removals of city officers and employees and city affairs.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2025; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.110. Prior: 1955 c 337 s 14; prior: 1943 c 271 s 19, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-28, part.]